nb: Lastenettstil: Bagasjestrikknett; Knyttet taunett; Maskenett; Stroppenett; Båndnett; Annet
sk-SK: Štýl siete na batožinu: Sieť z elastických lán; Uzlovaná lanová sieť; Sieťovina; Mriežková sieť z popruhov; Popruhová sieť; Iné
pl: Styl siatki transportowej: Siatka z linek elastycznych (bungee); Siatka ze sznurka węzłowego; Siatka tkana; Siatka z pasów; Siatka taśmowa; Inne
zh-TW: 捆貨網樣式: 彈力繩網; 結繩網; 網眼網; 綁帶格網; 織帶網; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на товарната мрежа: Мрежа с бънджи въже; Мрежа с възли; Фина мрежа; Мрежа с преплетени ремъци; Мрежа от ленти; Друго
en: Cargo net style: Bungee cord net; Knotted rope net; Mesh net; Strap lattice net; Webbing net; Other
sv: Lastnätsstil: Elastiskt nät; Knutet repnät; Masknät; Remnät; Bandnät; Annat
pt-BR: Estilo da rede de carga: Rede de cordão elástico; Rede de corda com nós; Rede de malha; Rede entrelaçada de tiras; Rede de cintas; Outro
da: Type af lastnet: Elastiknet; Knyttet rebnet; Net i mesh; Strop-gitter-net; Net i gjordbånd; Andet
ro-RO: Stilul plasei de marfă: Plasă din corzi elastice; Plasă din frânghie înnodată; Plasă tip mesh; Plasă din benzi încrucișate; Plasă din chingi; Altele
ru: Тип багажной сетки: Сетка из эспандерного шнура; Узловая веревочная сетка; Мелкоячеистая сетка; Ремешковая сетка; Сетка из стропы; Другое
lt-LT: Krovinio tinklo stilius: Tamprių virvių tinklas; Mazgytų virvių tinklas; Smulkaus tinklelio; Dirželių tinklelis; Austinių juostų tinklelis; Kita
cs: Styl nákladové sítě: Síť z gumových lan; Uzlovaná lanová síť; Síťovina; Popruhová mřížková síť; Popruhová síť; Jiné
it: Stile rete da carico: Rete in corda elastica; Rete in corda annodata; Rete a maglia; Rete con cinghie incrociate; Rete in fettuccia; Altro
el: Στυλ διχτυού φορτίου: Δίχτυ με ελαστικό κορδόνι (bungee); Δίχτυ με κόμπους; Δίχτυ τύπου mesh; Δίχτυ με πλέγμα από ιμάντες; Δίχτυ από ιμάντες; Άλλο
es: Tipo de red de carga: Red de cuerda elástica; Red de cuerda anudada; Red de malla; Red de correas cruzadas; Red de cinchas; Otro
tr: Yük ağı stili: Bungee kordonu ağı; Düğümlü ip ağı; Gözenekli ağ; Kafes kayış ağı; Dokuma ağ; Diğer
hu: Raktérháló stílusa: Gumikötél háló; Csomózott kötéllháló; Sűrű szövésű háló; Hevederes háló; Szövetháló; Egyéb
fi: Tavaraverkon malli: Joustoverkko; Solmittu köysiverkko; Verkkokangas; Hihnaverkko; Nauhaverkko; Muu
nl: Laadnet stijl: Bagagespin; Geknoopt touwnet; Gaasnet; Spanbandnet; Singelbandnet; Overige
hr-HR: Stil mreže za teret: Mreža od elastičnog užeta; Mreža od čvorastog užeta; Sitna mreža; Mreža od isprepletenih traka; Mreža od remenja; Ostalo
pt-PT: Estilo de rede de carga: Rede de cordas elásticas; Rede de corda com nós; Rede em malha; Rede de tiras entrecruzadas; Rede de lona; Outro
sl-SI: Stil tovorne mreže: Mreža iz elastičnih vrvi; Mreža iz vozlane vrvi; Fina mreža (mesh); Mreža s prepletenimi trakovi; Mreža iz tkanih trakov; Drugo
fr: Style de filet de chargement: Filet tendeur; Filet en corde à nœuds; Filet à mailles; Filet à sangles croisées; Filet en sangle; Autre
vi: Kiểu lưới chở hàng: Lưới dây bungee; Lưới dây thừng thắt nút; Lưới mắt nhỏ; Lưới đan dây chéo; Lưới dây dù; Khác
ko: 화물망 유형: 번지 코드 네트; 매듭형 로프 네트; 메시 네트; 스트랩 격자 네트; 웨빙 네트; 기타
th: รูปแบบตาข่ายบรรทุกสินค้า: ตาข่ายเชือกบันจี้; ตาข่ายเชือกถัก; ตาข่ายแบบตาถี่; ตาข่ายสานแบบสายรัด; ตาข่ายแบบสายถัก; อื่นๆ
de: Bauart des Laderaumnetzes: Expander-Netz; Geknotetes Seilnetz; Maschennetz; Gurtbandnetz; Gurtnetz; Sonstige
zh-CN: 后备箱网兜款式: 弹力绳网; 打结绳网; 细密网兜; 绑带格网; 织带网; 其他
ja: 荷台ネットスタイル: バンジーコードネット; 結び目ロープネット; メッシュネット; ストラップラティスネット; ウェビングネット; その他